Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.835 is amended to read:
181A.835. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Emergency services provider” means any public employer that employs persons  to provide
firefighting or emergency medical  services.
[(b) “Emergency services personnel” means any employee of an  emergency services provider who
is engaged in providing firefighting services. ]
[(c)] (b) “Employee assistance program” means a program established by a [ law enforcement ]
public safety agency, emergency services provider or mass  transit district to provide counseling or
support services to employees of the [ law enforcement ] public safety  agency, emergency services
provider or mass transit district.
[(d) “Law enforcement  agency” means any county sheriff, municipal police department, police de-
partment established by a university  under ORS 352.121 or 353.125, the Oregon State Police and any
state or local public body that employs or utilizes public safety personnel. ]
[(e)] (c) “Mass transit district” means a mass transit district established under ORS 267.010  to
267.394.
[(f) “Mass transit district personnel” means an employee of a mass transit district. ]
[(g) “Public safety personnel” means a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer, police officer
commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125, state police officer, parole and  probation
officer, corrections employee,  certified reserve officer, reserve officer, telecommunicator or emergency
medical dispatcher.]
[(2) Any communication made by a participant  or counselor in a peer support counseling session
conducted by a law  enforcement agency, an emergency services provider or a mass transit district for
public safety personnel, emergency services personnel or mass transit district personnel, and any  oral
or written information conveyed in the peer support counseling session, is confidential and  may not be
disclosed by any person participating in the peer support counseling session. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3929 (HB 3929-A) Page 1
(d) “Peer support services recipient” means  an employee of a public safety agency,
emergency services provider or mass transit district who receives peer support services.
(e) “Peer supporter” means a person who has been designated by a public  safety agency,
an emergency services provider or a mass transit district  and who has received training
approved by a public safety agency, emergency services provider or mass transit district to
provide emotional and moral support and services to a peer  support services recipient who
needs the support and services as a result of an incident in which the peer  support services
recipient was involved while acting in the peer  support services recipient’s official capacity
or to deal with other stress that impacts the peer support services recipient’s performance
of official duties.
(f) “Public safety agency” means:
(A) A county sheriff, municipal police department or police department established  by a
university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(B) The Oregon State Police.
(C) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(D) The Department of Corrections.
(E) An employer of parole and probation officers, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(F) The Marshal’s Office of the Judicial Department.
(G) An employer of telecommunicators, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(H) An office of a medical examiner, as defined in ORS 146.003.
(2)(a) This section applies only to communications or information when:
(A) The peer support services recipient or peer supporter made the communication or
conveyed the  information while receiving or providing individual or group peer support ser-
vices as a result of a traumatic event or repeated exposure to traumatic events in which the
peer support services  recipient was involved while acting in the peer support services
recipient’s official capacity;
(B) A public safety agency, emergency services provider or mass transit agency  desig-
nated the peer supporter as a peer supporter before the peer support services occurred;
(C) The communication was made or  the information was conveyed while the peer sup-
porter was acting in the capacity of a peer supporter; and
(D) The peer supporter was not directly involved in any traumatic  event that caused the
peer support services recipient to need peer support services.
(b) This section applies to communications or information regardless  of whether the peer
supporter and the peer support services recipient are employed by the same employer.
(3) Any communication or oral or written information that satisfies  the requirements
of subsection (2) of this section  that is made or conveyed by a peer support services recipient
or a peer supporter in the course of peer support services  conducted by a public safety
agency, an emergency services provider or a mass transit district is confidential and may
not be disclosed by any person participating in the peer support services.
[(3)] (4) Any communication relating to [ a peer support counseling session ] peer support ser-
vices made confidential under subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section that is made between [ counselors,
between counselors ] peer supporters, between peer supporters  and the supervisors or staff of an
employee assistance program, or between the  supervisors or staff of an employee assistance pro-
gram, is confidential and may not be disclosed.
[(4) The provisions of this section apply only to peer  support counseling sessions conducted by an
employee or other person who: ]
[(a) Has been designated by a law enforcement agency, emergency  services provider or mass transit
district, or by an employee assistance program, to act as a counselor; and ]
[(b) Has received training in counseling and in providing emotional  and moral support to public
safety personnel, emergency services personnel or mass transit  district personnel who have been in-
volved in emotionally traumatic incidents by reason of their employment. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3929 (HB 3929-A) Page 2
(5) Any communication or oral or written information that satisfies  the requirements
of subsection (2) of this section that is made by a peer support services recipient or peer
supporter in the course of peer support services is not  admissible in any judicial proceeding,
administrative proceeding, arbitration proceeding or other adjudicatory proceeding. Commu-
nications and information  made confidential under this section may not be disclosed by the
participants in any judicial proceeding, administrative proceeding,  arbitration proceeding or
other adjudicatory proceeding. The limitations on disclosure imposed by this subsection  in-
clude disclosure during any discovery conducted as part of an adjudicatory proceeding.
[(5)] (6) The provisions of this section apply to all oral communications, notes, records and re-
ports arising out of [ a peer support counseling session ] peer  support services . Any notes, records
or reports arising out  of [ a peer support counseling session ] peer support services  are not public
records for the purpose of ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
[(6) Any communication made by a participant  or counselor in a peer support counseling session
subject to this section, and any oral or written information conveyed in a peer support  counseling ses-
sion subject to this section, is not admissible in  any judicial proceeding, administrative proceeding,
arbitration proceeding or other adjudicatory proceeding. Communications  and information made confi-
dential under this section may not be disclosed by the participants in  any judicial proceeding, admin-
istrative proceeding, arbitration proceeding or other adjudicatory proceeding. The limitations  on
disclosure imposed by this subsection include disclosure during any discovery conducted as part of  an
adjudicatory proceeding. ]
(7) Nothing in this section limits the discovery  or introduction in evidence of knowledge ac-
quired by any [ public safety personnel, emergency services personnel or mass transit district
personnel] peer supporter or employee of a public safety  agency, emergency services provider
or mass transit district  from observation made during the course of  employment, or material or
information acquired during the course of employment, that is otherwise subject to discovery or in-
troduction in evidence.
(8) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any threat of suicide or homicide made by a  participant in [ a peer support counseling
session] peer support services , or any information conveyed in [ a peer support counseling session ]
the course of peer support services  relating to a threat of suicide or homicide;
(b) Any information relating to abuse of children or of the elderly,  or other information that is
required to be reported by law; or
(c) Any admission of criminal conduct.
(9) This section does not prohibit any communications between [ counselors who conduct peer
support counseling sessions ] peer supporters , or any  communications between [ counselors ] peer
supporters and the supervisors or staff of an employee assistance program.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 181A.835 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to
communications and information made or conveyed on or after the effective  date of this 2025
Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3929 (HB 3929-A) Page 3
Passed by House April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3929 (HB 3929-A) Page 4